test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    pozzelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozzelâdâm
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozáttâlâm
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pozáttâl
    puhhiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhhiidâđâm
    puiheldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puiheldâđâm
    punccâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punccârušâm
    punjâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâdâđâm
    punjâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâlâđâm
    punjâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâttâlâm
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punnjuustâlâm
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: punnjuustâl
    puoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puosâm
    puoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puácá
    puohčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puovčâm
    puovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puovŋâm
    purgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porgá
    purrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puurâm
    purrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porá
    purâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâdâđâm
    purâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâttâlâm
    puttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puutâm
    puttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pottá
    puuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puuvâm
    puuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pohá
    puunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puunjâm
    puunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ponjá
    puáimálâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáimálâstâlâm
    puárádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puárádâlâm
    puáránâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáránâdâm
    pyeredâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pyeredâđâm
    pálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pálustâlâm
    párudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: párudâl
    páránâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páránâšâm
    päjittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittâđâm
    raaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raajâm
    raaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráájá
    raattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráátá
    rahttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rahttâdâm
    raigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raaigâm
    raiđuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raiđuustâlâm
    rammuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rammuustâlâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâdâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâđâm
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâlâm
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâl
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâšâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâš
    rapettâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapettâšâm
    ravkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raavhâm
    reettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riätá
    renccidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: renccidât
    repčidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: repčidâđâm
    riehkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riehkâm
    riemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riemâm
    riemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riämá
    rievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rievdâm
    rievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riävdá
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riggodâdâm
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riggodât
    riiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riišâm
    ripšâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ripšâttâl
    ristâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riistâm
    riäváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäváttâlâm
    riäčásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riäčásâd
    rokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roohâm
    ronedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ronedât
    rooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roosâm
    rooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruácá
    roohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovâm
    roohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roohâđ
    roossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roosâm
    roossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rasa
    roottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roođâm
    roottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rata
    roppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roopâm
    roppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rappa
    rovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovdâm
    rovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ravda
    rovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovâm
    rovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ravva
    rošáidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rošáidâđâm
    rudodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rudodâđâm
    ruggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruugâm
    ruggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roggá
    ruhâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruhâdâlâm
    ruohâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruohâdât
    ruoinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruoinâm
    ruokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruohâm
    ruokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruákká
    ruoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruovâm
    ruossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruosâm
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâm
    ruovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruovgâm
    ruovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruovâdât
    ruoškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruášká
    ruoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruojâm
    ruoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruájá
    ruttiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruttiidâđâm
    ruáhásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáhásâdâm
    ruáinudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáinudâđâm
    ruákášâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruákášâđâm
    ruŋŋiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruŋŋiittâlâm
    ráhtádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhtádâđâm
    ráhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhástâlâm
    ráváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráváttâlâm
    ráđádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráđádâlâm
    rähistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rähistâlâm
    rävdijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rävdijâšâm
    saallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saalâm
    saarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saarâm
    saaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saajâm
    saađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saađâm
    sahhiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sahhiittâlâm
    sargâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saargâm
    savjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sávjá
    savâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savâstâlâm
    seellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siälá
    servâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seervâm
    servâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärvá
    seđŋiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seđŋiittâđâm
    sierriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierriistâlâm
    sierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierâm
    sierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärá
    sierŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärŋá
    sihodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihodâđâm
    siillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siilâm
    siittâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sitá
    sivnádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sivnádâlâm
    siärvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siärvástâlâm
    siäđuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäđuttâlâm
    skaaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáájá
    skalvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skálvá
    skarbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skaarbâm
    skaŋkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáŋkká
    skiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiivâm
    skiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skipá
    skilottuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skilottudâm
    skippuudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skippuudâđâm
    skirnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiirnâm
    skirviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skirviittâlâm
    skirvânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skirvânâd
    skiäŋkudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiäŋkudâđâm
    skovorâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skovorâšâm
    skođeruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skođerušâm
    skurbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuurbâm
    skyenidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skyenidâđâm
    skájuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skájuttâđâm
    smiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smietâm
    smiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiättá
    smietâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smietâstâlâm
    snuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuolâm
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sodâstâlâm
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sodâstal
    sohtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahta
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooinâm
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saina
    soohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovâm
    soohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saha
    soollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soolâm
    soollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sala
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovâm
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suápá
    soottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soođâm
    soottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suátá
    sooŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooŋâm
    sooŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋa
    sotkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soođhâm
    sotkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suátká
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovodâđâm
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovodât
    sovâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovâttâlâm
    sovčástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovčástâl
    sovđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savđa
    spassiibâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spassiibâšâm
    spellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: speelâm
    spellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiällá
    spiddáádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiddáádât
    spiiđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiđá
    spirppáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spirppáástâlâm
    spohhiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spohhiistâlâm
    spolččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spoolčâm
    srevžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sreevžâm
    stapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapârâšâm
    stoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stooigâm
    stookkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stoovâm
    stookkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuáká
    storccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuárccá
    sturccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sturcám
    sturccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sturccá
    stuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuulâm
    stuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stulá
    stuuččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuujâm
    stuárástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuárástâlâm
    suddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suudâm
    sulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suulgâm
    sulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: solgá
    sundáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sundáttâlâm
    suogârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suogârdâlâm
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suorgâttâlâm
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgâttâl
    suoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoskâm
    suoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáská
    suossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suásá
    suotâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstâlâm
    suovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suovâm
    suovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suává
    suoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáčá
    suođđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáđá
    surguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: surguttâlâm
    surâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: surâdât
    suttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suutâm
    suttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suttá
    suuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvâm
    suuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suhá
    suuijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suujâm
    suuijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sojá
    suunnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suunâm
    suunnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soná
    suunâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suunâttâlâm
    suuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvâm
    suuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sopá
    suurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suurâm
    suurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sorá
    sánádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sánádâlâm
    sápustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sápustâlâm
    sárnuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sárnuttâlâm
    sávrudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sávrudâđâm
    taaidârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaidârâšâm
    taammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taamâm
    taammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táámá
    tabadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tabadâlâm
    tabžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taabžâm
    tabžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tábžá
    tahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taavtâm
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaibâm
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táibá
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaigâm
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táigá
    talvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tálvá
    tanccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taancâm
    tappiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tappiittâđâm
    tarjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taarjâm
    tarjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tárjá
    teddilâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddilât
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teeivâm
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäivá
    telmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälmám
    telmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälmá
    teltastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teltastâlâm
    terppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teerpâm
    terppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiärppá
    tevŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiävŋá
    tiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälá
    tiervâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiervâttâlâm
    tievvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiävá
    tiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tipá
    tikkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tikkiistâlâm
    tikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiihâm
    tikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tikká
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäddáluuvčâm
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäddálâhš
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláádâđâm
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälláádât
    tiäđustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäđustâlâm
    tohâluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohâludâm
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tooimâm
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáimá
    tolliidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolliidâđâm
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovâm
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huámmášumijd
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerhâ
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taha
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toolâm
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syeligâsâst
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálá
    toommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toomâm
    toommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuámá
    toppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toopâm
    toppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tappa
    tovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovgâm
    tovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tavga
    tovkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovhâm
    tovkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuávkká
    tovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâdâđâm
    tubdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâstâlâm
    tubdâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâttâđâm
    tubdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuubdâm
    tubdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tobdá
    tubákkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubákkâšâm
    tulkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuulhâm
    tulkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tolkká
    tulvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulvá
    tuoibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoibâm
    tuoibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáibá
    tuoldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoldâm
    tuoldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáldá
    tuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuolmâm
    tuolvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuolvâm
    tuolvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálvá
    tuommiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuommiittâđâm
    tuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuovâm
    tuopânjâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuopânjâšâm
    tuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuorâm
    tuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárá
    tuossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuosâm
    tuostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuostâm
    tuostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuástá
    tuovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuovŋâm
    tuovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuávŋá
    turedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turedâđâm
    turššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turššá
    tutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuuđhâm
    tutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: totká
    tuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: topá
    tuuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuuđâm
    tuuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: totá
    tuuŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toŋá
    tuáhtáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuáhtárušâm
    tuájáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájárušâm
    tuálvuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvuttâlâm
    tuápudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuápudât
    tuávidâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuávidâšâm
